Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) Behavioral health crisis services are cost-effective and reduce burdens on other emergency systems. According to the all payer claims database from 2022 through 2024, aggregate health plan claims payments for hospital emergency department visits where patients have primary mental health diagnoses cost far more than behavioral health crisis services;(b) Behavioral health crisis services which include, but are not limited to, mobile crisis response, crisis relief centers, and crisis stabilization units, provide customized care specific to behavioral health conditions that support people to recover as a more effective alternative to hospital emergency departments;(c) By giving first responders, family members, and people with behavioral health conditions a place to go and someone to respond in a crisis, behavioral health crisis services help people avoid overburdened emergency departments, inpatient hospitals, and jails;(d) Behavioral health crisis services should be available to all regardless of insurance status, residency, age, or diagnosis, similar to medical emergency services;(e) The substance abuse and mental health services administration recommends a comprehensive, 24/7, community-based crisis system that is funded under a firehouse model rather than through traditional insurance reimbursement;(f) RCW 48.43.093 requires health carriers to cover behavioral health emergency services for people enrolled in their health plans. Federal and state mental health parity laws require private health insurance to provide comparable coverage of medical and behavioral health emergency services;(g) Despite ongoing efforts from the office of the insurance commissioner, behavioral health administrative services organizations, behavioral health agencies, and health carriers to implement this coverage requirement, payments for behavioral health emergency services by private health plans remain limited. This is due in part to the challenges of obtaining health insurance information when a client is experiencing a behavioral health crisis or its aftermath and to the complexity of billing private health insurers given limited administrative capacity and billing expertise of behavioral health crisis providers. Due to these structural barriers, there are not clear and consistent systems for payments for behavioral health crisis services by health carriers as required by RCW 48.43.093. As a result, Washington state taxpayers have been subsidizing this care;(h) Behavioral health administrative services organizations are best positioned to administer and implement the array of community-based behavioral health crisis services that a region needs and its providers can deliver, within their limited available resources, given their role as regional behavioral health crisis services authorities under RCW 71.24.045;(i) A streamlined payment mechanism that does not require billing or contracting with certain health insurers is needed to sustain access to behavioral health crisis services and to ensure that private health insurers provide the financial contribution for these services that RCW 48.43.093 and mental health parity laws are intended to result in; and(j) Communities throughout Washington are seeking to expand access to behavioral health crisis care by establishing new facilities, often with state capital funding, but neither state funding nor private health insurance funding is sufficient to support services in these facilities. Too many have been unable to start providing services in their community.(2) The legislature intends to create a broad-based, ongoing, dedicated funding source for behavioral health crisis services provided to people that are not eligible for medicaid reimbursement, and for people who are not enrolled in medicaid, which will be in lieu of directly submitting claims for these services to health insurers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Adjustment factor" means the sum of inflation change and population change for the biennium during which an adjustment increase, as provided in section 3(7) of this act, is being calculated.(2) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner or his or her designee.(3) "Covered entity" means:(a) A health carrier, as defined in RCW 48.43.005;(b) A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in RCW 48.125.010; and(c) Public or private employer-sponsored self-funded employee welfare health benefit plans or Taft-Hartley multiemployer health benefit plans.(4)(a) "Covered lives" means all persons residing in Washington state who are enrolled in health coverage offered by the following entities:(i) A health plan offered by a health carrier, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. For purposes of this subsection only, "health plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.43.005 but does not include medicare advantage plans established under medicare part C, outpatient prescription drug plans established under medicare part D, or federal employee health benefit plans;(ii) A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in RCW 48.125.010; and(iii) Public or private employer-sponsored self-funded employee welfare health benefit plans or Taft-Hartley multiemployer health benefit plans.(b) "Covered lives" does not include lives enrolled in medicaid managed care organizations under contract with the health care authority.(5) "Inflation change" means the percentage change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bellevue area, or successor index, as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics, for the biennium during which an adjustment increase, as provided in section 3(7) of this act, is being calculated.(6) "Population change" means the percentage change in state population as reported by the office of financial management for the biennium during which an adjustment increase, as provided in section 3(7) of this act, is being calculated.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) All covered entities shall pay an annual covered lives assessment beginning January 1, 2027.(2) The commissioner shall annually assess a per member per month assessment per covered life for covered entities. The per member per month assessment in calendar year 2027 shall be 58 cents per covered life. The assessment shall be updated every two years in accordance with the process established in subsection (7) of this section.(3) The commissioner shall annually issue a notice to each covered entity of the total assessment and its payment obligation for the upcoming year. The commissioner shall determine a payment schedule for receipt of assessments under this section. Payment collections may be made no more frequently than quarterly.(4)(a) Covered entities shall provide the commissioner the information needed to calculate the covered entity's covered lives subject to the assessment in a form and manner determined by the commissioner.(b) The commissioner may contract with an entity to carry out some or all of the functions included in this subsection and subsections (1) through (3) of this section including, but not limited to, obtaining information regarding each covered entity's covered lives and administering the collection of assessments under this section.(5)(a) Payments from covered entities are due to the commissioner within 45 days of the receipt of notice of their payment obligation determined under this section. The commissioner shall charge interest as detailed by RCWÂ  43.17.240, which begins to accrue on the 46th day, on amounts received after the 45-day period.(b) The commissioner may allow each covered entity in arrears to submit a payment plan, subject to approval by the commissioner. An initial payment under an approved payment plan is due upon execution of the payment plan.(c) Any covered entity failing to pay the assessment within 90 days of notification of the payment obligation under this section must be assessed a penalty. The penalty under this subsection is 150 percent of the assessment owed. The assessment, penalty, and interest owed may be collected by distraint, and recovered by any action instituted by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction. In addition to the penalties and interest outlined in this subsection, the commissioner may revoke a certificate of authority or registration issued by the commissioner to a health carrier. The certificate of authority or registration may not be reissued until all assessments, penalties, and interest have been fully paid to the commissioner.(6) The commissioner shall deposit annual assessments, interest, and civil penalties collected under this section with the state treasurer to the credit of the behavioral health emergency services account created in section 4 of this act.(7) Each June of even numbered years, the commissioner shall calculate the assessment for the next two calendar years by increasing the current assessment by known changes in the adjustment factor, except that the increase shall not exceed 10 percent. NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The behavioral health emergency services account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the assessments, interest, and penalties collected by the commissioner under section 3 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for:(a) Behavioral health emergency services administered through behavioral health administrative services organizations as defined in RCW 71.24.025 or federally recognized tribes located in this state, by the following behavioral health emergency services providers as defined in RCW 48.43.005:(i) A crisis stabilization unit as defined in RCW 71.05.020;(ii) A 23-hour crisis relief center as defined in RCW 71.24.025;(iii) An agency certified by the department of health under chapter 71.24 RCW to provide outpatient crisis services; and(iv) A mobile rapid response crisis team as defined in RCW 71.24.025 that is contracted with a behavioral health administrative services organization operating under RCW 71.24.045 to provide crisis response services in the behavioral health administrative services organization's service area;(b) Administrative costs for the health care authority associated with implementation of this act; and(c) Disbursements to refund erroneous or excessive payments made by covered entities as determined by the commissioner.(3) Expenditures from the account are subject to the following limitations:(a) The account may not be used for reimbursement of services identified in subsection (2) of this section provided to individuals enrolled in medical assistance programs that include coverage for these services under Title XIX of the federal social security act or Title XXI of the federal social security act; and(b) The account may not be used for reimbursement of services identified in subsection (2) of this section that have been directly billed by a provider or on the provider's behalf and reimbursed by a covered entity or payer for the covered entity or payer's enrollee.(4) A behavioral health administrative services organization, federally recognized tribe, health care provider, or health care entity that receives funds from the account may not bill a covered entity for behavioral health emergency services listed in this section provided to a covered life.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) The commissioner shall adopt rules and undertake actions necessary to implement sections 3 and 4 of this act including, but not limited to, measures to enforce reporting of covered lives, audits of covered lives reporting, and payment of applicable assessments.(2) The commissioner, in consultation with the health care authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and covered entities shall review and revise existing regulations to support transitioning payment for the services described in section 4(2) of this act to the prospective covered lives assessment established in section 3 of this act. This includes, but is not limited to:(a) Network access requirements;(b) Alternate access delivery requests;(c) Contracting requirements; and(d) Claims payment requirements.Sec. 6. RCW 48.49.135 and 2022 c 263 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When determining the adequacy of a proposed provider network or the ongoing adequacy of an in-force provider network, the commissioner must review the carrier's proposed provider network or in-force provider network to determine whether the network includes a sufficient number of contracted providers of emergency medicine, anesthesiology, pathology, radiology, neonatology, surgery, hospitalist, intensivist(([,])), and diagnostic services, including radiology and laboratory services at or for the carrier's contracted in-network hospitals or ambulatory surgical facilities to reasonably ensure enrollees have in-network access to covered benefits delivered at that facility.(2)(a) When determining the adequacy of a proposed provider network or the ongoing adequacy of an in-force provider network, the commissioner may allow a carrier to submit an alternate access delivery request. The commissioner shall define the circumstances under which a carrier may submit an alternate access delivery request and the requirements for submission and approval of such a request in rule. To submit an alternate access delivery request, a carrier shall:(i) Ensure that enrollees will not bear any greater cost of receiving services under the alternate access delivery request than if the provider or facility was contracted with the carrier or make other arrangements acceptable to the commissioner;(ii) Provide substantial evidence of good faith efforts on its part to contract with providers or facilities. If a carrier is submitting an alternate access delivery request for the same service and geographic area as a previously approved request, the carrier shall provide new or additional evidence of good faith efforts to contract associated with the current request;(iii) Demonstrate that there is not an available provider or facility with which the carrier can contract to meet the commissioner's provider network standards; and(iv) For services for which balance billing is prohibited under RCW 48.49.020, notify out-of-network providers or facilities that deliver the services referenced in the alternate access delivery request within five days of submitting the request to the commissioner. Any notification provided under this subsection shall include contact information for carrier staff who can provide detailed information to the affected provider or facility regarding the submitted alternate access delivery request.(b) For services for which balance billing is prohibited under RCW 48.49.020, a carrier may not treat its payment of nonparticipating providers or facilities under this chapter or P.L. 116-260 (enacted December 27, 2020) as a means to satisfy network access standards established by the commissioner unless all requirements of this subsection are met.(i) If a carrier is unable to obtain a contract with a provider or facility delivering services addressed in an alternate access delivery request to meet network access requirements, the carrier may ask the commissioner to amend the alternate access delivery request if the carrier's communication to the commissioner occurs at least three months after the effective date of the alternate access delivery request and demonstrates substantial evidence of good faith efforts on its part to contract for delivery of services during that three-month time period. If the carrier has demonstrated substantial evidence of good faith efforts on its part to contract, the commissioner shall allow a carrier to use the dispute resolution process provided in RCW 48.49.040 to determine the amount that will be paid to providers or facilities for services referenced in the alternate access delivery request. The commissioner may determine by rule the associated processes for use of the dispute resolution process under this subsection.(ii) Once notification is provided by the carrier to a provider or facility under (a) of this subsection, a carrier is not responsible for reimbursing a provider's or facility's charges in excess of the amount charged by the provider or facility for the same or similar service at the time the notification was provided. The provider or facility shall accept this reimbursement as payment in full.(3) ((When))(a) Except to the extent provided otherwise in (b) of this subsection, when determining the adequacy of a carrier's proposed provider network or the ongoing adequacy of an in-force provider network, beginning January 1, 2023, the commissioner shall require that the carrier's proposed provider network or in-force provider network include a sufficient number of contracted behavioral health emergency services providers.(b) When determining the adequacy of a carrier's proposed provider network or the ongoing adequacy of an in-force provider network, beginning January 1, 2027, a carrier that is making complete and timely payments of the covered lives assessment established in section 3 of this act is deemed to have an adequate provider network for the behavioral health emergency services referenced in section 4(2) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:The authority shall adopt rules and undertake actions necessary to ensure that behavioral health emergency services account funds appropriated to and expended by the authority are used in accordance with the conditions and limitations of chapter 48.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 14 of this act).Sec. 8. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, 2025 c 359 s 12, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the behavioral health emergency services account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 9. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the behavioral health emergency services account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 10. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the behavioral health emergency services account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 11. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the behavioral health emergency services account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 12. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the behavioral health emergency services account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 13. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the behavioral health emergency services account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. (1) Section 8 of this act expires the earlier of July 1, 2028, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2028.(3) Section 10 of this act expires the earlier of January 1, 2029, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(4) Section 11 of this act expires January 1, 2029.(5) Section 12 of this act expires when RCW 74.76.040 expires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. (1) Section 9 of this act takes effect when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Sections 10 and 11 of this act take effect July 1, 2028.(3) Sections 12 and 13 of this act take effect January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. The provisions of this act are not severable. In the event that any portion of this act shall have been validly implemented and the entire act is later rendered ineffective, prior assessments and payments under the validly implemented portions shall not be affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2026, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---